Maine, session 132, LD377.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §4365, as amended by PL 2005, c. 218, §44 and c. 457, Pt. AA,
§1 and affected by §8, is further amended to read:
§4365. Rate of tax
A tax is imposed on all cigarettes imported into this State or held in this State by any
person for sale at the rate of 100 150 mills for each cigarette. Payment of the tax is
evidenced by the affixing of stamps to the packages containing the cigarettes.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §4381 is amended to read:
§4381. Tax credited to General Fund; University of Maine college of medicine
The revenue derived from the tax imposed by this chapter shall must be credited to the
General Fund of the State. as follows:
1. University of Maine System. Thirty-three percent of the revenue must be credited
to the University of Maine System for the location, construction, equipping and operation
of a college of medicine authorized pursuant to Private and Special Law 1865, chapter 532,
section 9-A; and
2. General Fund. Sixty-seven percent of the revenue must be credited to the General
Fund.
Sec. 3. University of Maine System; college of medicine. The University of
Maine System shall locate, construct, equip and operate a college of medicine pursuant to
Private and Special Law 1865, chapter 532, section 9-A. The college of medicine must be
located in Penobscot County. The college of medicine must include, but is not limited to,
a rural health care course of study and clinic outreach to Aroostook County, Penobscot
County, Piscatiquis County, Washington County, Waldo County, Hancock County and
Somerset County.
Sec. 4. Effective date. Those sections of this Act that amend the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 36, sections 4365 and 4381 take effect July 1, 2026.